Maryland, session 2026, HB1089.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
14–1330.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “DATA BROKER” MEANS A BUSINESS THAT KNOWINGLY
COLLECTS AND SELLS OR LICENSES PERSONAL CONSUMER DATA TO THIRD PARTIES
WITH WHOM THE CONSUMER DOES NOT HAVE A DIRECT RELATIONSHIP.
(II) “DATA BROKER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1089*

HOUSE BILL 1089
1. A FINANCIAL INSTITUTION UNDER THE
GRAMM–LEACH–BLILEY ACT, PUBLIC LAW 106–102;
2. A COVERED HEALTH CARE ENTITY SUBJECT TO THE
HEALTH INSURANCE PORTABILITY AND ACCOUNTABILITY ACT OF 1996;
3. A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION;
4. A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY; OR
5. A SERVICE PROVIDER THAT PROCESSES DATA SOLELY
ON BEHALF OF A CONTROLLER, AS DEFINED IN § 14–4701 OF THIS TITLE.
(3) “MATERIAL CHANGE” MEANS A SIGNIFICANT UPDATE IN HOW A
DATA BROKER COLLECTS, USES, SHARES, OR SELLS PERSONAL INFORMATION, OR A
TRANSITION FROM SELLING TO SHARING DATA.
(B) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:
(1) PERSONAL DATA CONCERNING MARYLAND RESIDENTS IS
ROUTINELY COLLECTED, AGGREGATED, AND SOLD BY ENTITIES KNOWN AS DATA
BROKERS;
(2) MARYLAND RESIDENTS CURRENTLY LACK A CLEAR,
CENTRALIZED MEANS TO IDENTIFY DATA BROKERS OR UNDERSTAND DATA BROKER
PRACTICES; AND
(3) REGISTRATION AND TRANSPARENCY REQUIREMENTS ARE
NECESSARY TO PROTECT CONSUMERS, PREVENT FRAUD, AND MODERNIZE
CONSUMER PROTECTION LAW.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THIS SECTION IS TO PROVIDE BASIC OVERSIGHT OF
DATA BROKER ACTIVITY BY THE STATE WITHOUT RESTRICTING LAWFUL
COMMERCE.
(D) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING JANUARY 31,
2028, A DATA BROKER OPERATING IN THE STATE OR COLLECTING DATA ON THE
RESIDENTS OF THE STATE SHALL REGISTER WITH THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL BY:
(1) SUBMITTING THE FOLLOWING ON A FORM AND IN A FORMAT
ESTABLISHED BY THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL:

HOUSE BILL 1089 3
(I) CATEGORIES OF PERSONAL DATA COLLECTED BY THE DATA
BROKER;
(II) SOURCES OF PERSONAL DATA COLLECTED;
(III) CATEGORIES OF THIRD PARTIES TO WHOM DATA IS SOLD OR
SHARED;
(IV) CONTACT INFORMATION THAT CONSUMERS MAY USE TO
MAKE INQUIRIES; AND
(V) OPT–OUT METHODS OFFERED TO CONSUMERS, IF ANY; AND
(2) PAYING A FEE IN AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE OFFICE OF
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(E) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ESTABLISH THE FEE
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(2) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) IN AN AMOUNT SUFFICIENT TO PAY THE COSTS OF
ADMINISTERING THE REGISTRATION PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS
SECTION; AND
(2) AS A TIERED FEE STRUCTURE BASED ON THE ANNUAL REVENUE
OF A DATA BROKER.
(F) (1) A DATA BROKER SHALL REPORT TO THE OFFICE OF THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL ANY MATERIAL CHANGE IN THE BUSINESS PRACTICE OF THE
DATA BROKER DURING A REGISTRATION PERIOD.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY NOT CHARGE A FEE FOR THE
REPORTING OF A MATERIAL CHANGE BY A DATA BROKER UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
(G) (1) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL DEVELOP AND
MAINTAIN A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE, SEARCHABLE DATABASE OF REGISTERED DATA
BROKERS ON THE WEBSITE OF THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(2) THE DATABASE DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION:
(I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER ITEM (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, SHALL CONTAIN INFORMATION SUBMITTED TO THE OFFICE OF THE

HOUSE BILL 1089
ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) MAY NOT DISCLOSE ANY PROPRIETARY ALGORITHM OR
TRADE SECRET OF A DATA BROKER.
(H) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A DATA
BROKER THAT FAILS TO REGISTER WITH AND DISCLOSE REQUIRED INFORMATION
TO THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION
IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL FINE UP TO $10,000 PER VIOLATION.
(2) (I) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, THE OFFICE OF
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ISSUE NOTICE OF THE VIOLATION TO THE DATA
BROKER BEFORE INITIATING ANY ACTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) IF THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL ISSUES A
NOTICE OF THE VIOLATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
DATA BROKER SHALL HAVE 6 MONTHS TO CURE THE VIOLATION AFTER RECEIPT OF
THE NOTICE.
(III) IF A DATA BROKER FAILS TO CURE A VIOLATION WITHIN THE
TIME PERIOD SPECIFIED IN A NOTICE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN
ENFORCEMENT ACTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(I) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO CREATE OR IMPLY A
PRIVATE CAUSE OF ACTION FOR A VIOLATION OF ITS PROVISIONS.
(J) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS
TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 31,
2029, the Office of the Attorney General shall report to the General Assembly, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article:
(1) the number of registered data brokers in the State;
(2) the level of compliance rates among data brokers;
(3) the number of consumer complaints regarding data brokers received by
the Office of the Attorney General; and
(4) recommendations by the Office of the Attorney General for future
legislation to strengthen consumer protection in the State relating to data brokers.

HOUSE BILL 1089 5
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.